Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB274.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9722.1. Alternative sentencing for primary caretakers. (a) Sentencing.--Except as otherwise provided under this section, immediately after the conviction of a person for a nonviolent offense and before sentencing, the court shall determine if the person convicted is a primary caretaker of a dependent child. If the court determines that the person convicted of a nonviolent offense is a primary caretaker of a dependent child, the court shall impose an individually assessed sentence without confinement in a prison, work camp, halfway 1234567891011121314151617181920 facility or similar institution and based on community rehabilitation with a focus on parent-child unity and support.(b) Conditions.--In imposing a sentence on a primary caretaker of a dependent child convicted of a nonviolent offense, the court shall require the person to participate in a program that meets certain conditions that the court considers appropriate, including any of the following: (1) Drug and alcohol treatment. (2) Domestic violence education and prevention. (3) Physical and sexual abuse counseling. (4) Mental health treatment and counseling. (5) Vocational and educational services. (6) Job training and placement education. (7) Affordable and safe housing assistance education. (8) Financial literacy. (9) Evidence-based parenting skills classes. (10) Family and individual counseling. (11) Family case management services. (c) Appearance.--The court may require a primary caretaker of a dependent child serving a sentence under this section to appear in court at regularly scheduled intervals and otherwise at any time as the court determines necessary during the person's sentence for the following purposes: (1) Evaluating the person's progress in treatment or rehabilitation.(2) Determining if the person has violated a condition of the sentence.(d) Modification.--During an appearance in court under subsection (c), the court may do any of the following:(1) Modify the conditions of a sentence imposed in 20250SB0274PN0228 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accordance with this section.(2) Decrease the duration of a sentence imposed under this section based on the person's successful advancement . (3) Sanction the person for a violation of a condition of the sentence imposed under this section, including requiring the person to serve a term of imprisonment within the range of the sentence for a person who is not a primary caretaker of a dependent child as specified under the laws of this Commonwealth.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Dependent child." A person who is under 18 years of age and unemancipated."Nonviolent offense." An offense which is not a crime of violence as defined in section 9714(g) (relating to sentences for second and subsequent offenses)."Primary caretaker of a dependent child." As follows: (1) Any of the following: (i) A parent who has consistently assumed responsibility for the housing, health and safety of a child prior to incarceration.(ii) A woman who is pregnant or has given birth to a child after or while awaiting her sentencing hearing and expresses a willingness to the court to assume responsibility for the housing, health and safety of her child.(2) A parent who, in the best interest of the child, has arranged for the temporary care of the child in the home of a relative or other responsible adult shall not, for that 20250SB0274PN0228 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reason, be excluded from this definition.Section 2. Section 9732 of Title 42 is amended to read:§ 9732. Contents of presentence report.The presentence report shall include a summary of the circumstances attending the commission of the crime, the history of delinquency or criminality, physical and mental condition, family situation and background, including whether the defendant is pregnant or the primary caretaker of a dependent child, economic status, education, occupation and personal habits of the defendant, any history of drug or alcohol abuse or addiction and any other matters that the person preparing the report deems relevant or that the court directs be included.Section 3. Chapter 33 of Title 61 is amended by adding a subchapter heading immediately preceding section 3301 to read:SUBCHAPTER AMEDICAL SERVICES ACTSection 4. Sections 3301, 3302 introductory paragraph and 3303(a) and (g) of Title 61 are amended to read:§ 3301. Short title of [chapter] subchapter.This [chapter] subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the Correctional Institution Medical Services Act.§ 3302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this [chapter] subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *§ 3303. Medical Services Program.(a) Establishment.--The Medical Services Program is established in the department which shall include, but not be limited to, the provisions of this [chapter] subchapter. The 20250SB0274PN0228 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 program shall be a copay program requiring inmates to pay a fee to cover a portion of the actual costs of the medical services provided.* * * (g) Deposits.--Medical services fees collected under this [chapter] subchapter shall be deposited in the General Fund.Section 5. Chapter 33 of Title 61 is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER BMATERNITY MEDICAL SERVICES ACTSec.3321. Short title of subchapter.3322. Definitions.3323. Maternity Medical Services Program. 3324. Powers and duties of department. 3325. Report to General Assembly. § 3321. Short title of subchapter. This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the Correctional Institution Maternity Medical Services Act.§ 3322. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Eligible inmate." A woman who was convicted of a nonviolent offense and who has been committed to the custody of the department and who is pregnant or who has given birth to a child."Nonviolent offense." An offense which is not a crime of violence as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 9714(g) (relating to sentences for second and subsequent offenses).20250SB0274PN0228 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Program." The Maternity Medical Services Program established for eligible inmates under section 3323(a) (relating to Maternity Medical Services Program).§ 3323. Maternity Medical Services Program. (a) Establishment.--T he Maternity Medical Services Program is established in the department. The department shall, by regulation, administer the program to provide maternity medical services and postpartum care for women who are pregnant or who have given birth to a child while in the custody of the department. The program shall include the provisions of this subchapter.(b) Administration.--The program shall be a copay program requiring eligible inmates to pay a fee to cover a portion of the actual costs of the medical services provided under the program in accordance with Subchapter A (relating to Medical Services Act). The department may not deny eligibility for the program due to the inability of an eligible inmate to pay the fee required under this subsection. The department shall also utilize other funding methods, including private insurance or funding available from the Federal Government or the Commonwealth, for reimbursement of the medical services provided under the program and associated labor, delivery and postpartum care for the period specified under subsection (c).(c) Program requirements.--(1) The program shall provide medical services to the following:(i) An eligible inmate for a period of not more than eight months during the eligible inmate's pregnancy prior to a child's birth.(ii) An eligible inmate who has given birth to a 20250SB0274PN0228 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 child for a period of not less than 12 consecutive months or for the remainder of the term of incarceration, whichever is less.(2) The program shall place an eligible inmate who has given birth to a child in a community corrections center or community corrections facility with the child for the period specified under paragraph (1)(ii). The community corrections center or community corrections facility shall provide adequate housing and accommodations to the eligible inmate and the child, including access to pediatric care and other appropriate medical services.(3) The program shall include community-based programming for an eligible inmate, including postpartum care programming for the purpose of promoting mother-child bonding, in addition to other conditions required by the court under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9722.1(b) (relating to a lternative sentencing for primary caretakers). The community-based programming shall also include the following:(i) E vidence-based parenting skills programming. (ii) Vocational training, employment-seeking skills and employment at a paid position.(iii) Educational programming.(iv) Drug and alcohol dependency treatment.(v) Mental health treatment services.§ 3324. Powers and duties of department. (a) Implementation.--The department shall implement the program by:(1) Issuing regulations as required under section 3323(a) (relating to Maternity Medical Services Program).(2) Providing department staff and medical services 20250SB0274PN0228 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 providers with training relating to the program.(3) Developing administrative forms for the implementation of the program.(4) Providing for administrative and accounting procedures for the program and an annual audit of the program.(5) Providing written notice to all current inmates regarding implementation of the program.(b) Explanation of program.--Each inmate shall be advised of the medical services fees and payment procedures at the time of intake. An explanation of the program regulations shall be included in the inmate handbook.(c) Written notice of changes.--Each inmate shall receive written notice of any changes in medical services fees and payment procedures and an initial written notice of the program's implementation.(d) Payment for medical services.-- (1) No eligible inmate shall be denied access to medical services under the program because of an inability to pay the required fees under section 3323(b).(2) The department shall devise and implement a program whereby inmates of State correctional institutions who have medical insurance shall pay for their own maternal medical needs through that insurance. This program shall be contained in regulations promulgated by the department.§ 3325. Report to General Assembly. The department shall submit to the chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, the chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, the chair and minority chair of the Judiciary 20250SB0274PN0228 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives an annual report on the program established by this subchapter. The report may recommend legislative changes for the program and propose model legislation for counties which may wish to develop similar programs.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0274PN0228 - 9 - 1234567